Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 5. Venereal Diseases.

§ 32.1-55.
Definition.

As used in this article,
“venereal disease”
includes syphilis, gonorrhea, chancroid, granuloma inguinale, lymphogranuloma venereum and any other sexually transmittable disease determined by the Board to be dangerous to the public health.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-90; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-55.1.
Anonymous testing sites for human immunodeficiency virus.

From such funds as are appropriated for this purpose, the Board of Health shall make available in all health services areas of the Commonwealth anonymous testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus.

History.

1989, c. 613.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 32.1-56.
Information to be provided patients.

It shall be the duty of every physician or other person who examines or treats a person having a venereal disease to provide such person with information about the disease, including, as a minimum, the nature of the disease, methods of treatment, measures used in preventing the spread of such disease, and the necessity of tests to ensure that a cure has been accomplished.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-92; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-57.
Examination, testing and treatment; failure to comply with order of examination.

A local health director may require any person suspected of being infected with any venereal disease to submit to examination, testing and treatment if necessary.

If any such person refuses to submit to an examination, testing or treatment or to continue treatment until found to be cured by proper test, the local health director may apply to the appropriate circuit court for an order compelling such examination, testing or treatment. Any person willfully failing to comply with such order shall be punishable as for contempt of court.

If a person infected with venereal disease is required by the local health director to receive treatment therefor and such person receives such treatment from the local health department, no fee shall be charged.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-93; 1979, c. 711; 1988, c. 399.

Law Review.

For survey on evidence in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (1989).

§ 32.1-58.
Persons convicted of certain crimes to be examined, tested and treated.

Each person convicted of a violation of §

18.2-346

,

18.2-346.01

, or

18.2-361

shall be examined and tested for venereal disease and treated if necessary.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-94; 1979, c. 711; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “18.2-346.01, or

18.2-361

” for “or §

18.2-361

.”

§ 32.1-59.
Examination and treatment in certain institutions.

Every person admitted to any state correctional institution and every person admitted to a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall be examined and tested for venereal disease. If the person is found to be infected with a venereal disease, the person in charge of such institution or state hospital or training center shall promptly provide treatment and shall report such case as provided in §

32.1-37

.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-104; 1979, c. 711; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “admitted to a state hospital or training center operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “who is confined to a state hospital for the mentally ill or mentally retarded” in the first sentence; and in the second sentence, substituted “If the person” for “If any such person” and inserted “or state hospital or training center.”

§ 32.1-60.
Prenatal tests required.

Every physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner attending a pregnant woman during gestation shall examine and test such woman for such venereal diseases as the Board may designate within 15 days after beginning such attendance. Every other person permitted by law to attend upon pregnant women but not permitted by law to make such examinations and tests, shall cause such examinations and tests to be made by a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner, or clinic. Serological tests required by this section may be performed by the Department of General Services, Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services (DCLS).

History.

Code 1950, § 32-104.1; 1950, p. 108; 1979, c. 711; 1980, c. 184; 1984, c. 140; 1993, c. 364; 2004, c. 855; 2006, c. 396.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or nurse practitioner” following “Every physician” and substituted “15 days” for “fifteen days” in the first sentence; and inserted “licensed nurse practitioner” following “licensed physician” in the second sentence. For effective date, see Editor’s notes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).